Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1229.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2.2(a) of the act of June 19, 1931 (P.L.589, No.202), referred to as the Barbers' License Law, is amended to read:Section 2.2. (a) The State Board of Barber Examiners shall consist of the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs; the Director of the Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of the Attorney General, or his designee; three members who shall be persons representing the public at large and six members, each of whom shall be a [citizen of the United States and a] resident of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, 123456789101112131415161718192021 shall have been a registered barber under the laws of this Commonwealth and shall have engaged in the profession of barbering in this Commonwealth for a period of at least five years immediately preceding his appointment. Each professional and public member shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1229PN1445 - 2 - 12345678